Maine, session 132, LD1512.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §1718-K is enacted to read:
§1718-K. Billing practices
1. Definition of health care entity. As used in this section, "health care entity" has
the same meaning as in section 1718-B, subsection 1, paragraph B.
2. Discrimination based on method of payment prohibited. A health care entity
may not deny a health care service or treatment, or refuse to continue to provide a health
care service or treatment, to a patient based on a determination or assumption by the health
care entity about the patient's insured status or method of payment, including but not limited
to whether the patient is a self-pay patient, is uninsured, is insured under an individual
policy, is insured under a group policy or is covered under an employer's self-insured health
plan.
3. Disclosure of discounted cash price option. A health care entity shall disclose the
discounted cash price for a health care service or treatment to a patient upon request and
shall permit the patient to pay the discounted cash price for any health care service or
treatment provided to the patient. For the purposes of this subsection, "discounted cash
price" means:
A. With respect to a hospital, the discounted cash price as defined in 45 Code of
Federal Regulations, Section 180.20 if the hospital has a discounted cash price and
does not mean the amount charged to individuals who are eligible for free care or are
eligible for the amounts charged pursuant to a hospital's financial assistance policy; or
B. With respect to a health care entity that is not a hospital, the charge that applies to
an enrollee who is paying for a health care service without filing a claim with a carrier.
4. Itemized bill requirement. A health care entity shall, without charge, provide to
a patient upon request an itemized bill disclosing in detail all amounts charged with respect
to a health care service or treatment provided by the health care entity, including a health
care service or treatment provided in conjunction with the scheduled health care service or
treatment by another health care entity, no later than 30 business days after providing the
health care service or treatment.
5. Lower price requirement. In the case of an uninsured patient being provided or
seeking to be provided a health care service or treatment by a health care entity, including
a health care service or treatment that is reasonably expected to be provided in conjunction
with the scheduled health care service or treatment and the health care service or treatment
reasonably expected to be so provided by another health care entity, the health care entity
may not charge for providing the health care service or treatment more than the lesser of:
A. The amount payable to the health care entity by Medicare for the health care service
or treatment; and
B. The lowest amount payable to the health care entity under any of its contractual
arrangements with group health plans, group or individual insurance coverage offered
by a health insurance issuer or federal health care programs.
Page 1 - 132LR1902(01)